Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Succession.

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1971 “lieutenant governor” was substituted for “secretary of state” in this article to conform with the 1970 amendment to the state constitution.

Sec. 44.19.040.
Appointment of successor to lieutenant governor.

After taking an initial term of office, the governor shall appoint, from among the officers who head the principal departments of the state government or otherwise, a person to succeed to the office of lieutenant governor if the office of lieutenant governor becomes vacant.
The appointment is subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature meeting in joint session.
The person designated and confirmed is next in line for succession to the office of lieutenant governor, subject to the pleasure of the governor. If the person designated and confirmed is removed from or vacates the appointment, the governor shall appoint a successor subject to confirmation in the same manner as the person initially appointed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 174 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.120. Renumbered in 1980. Also in 1980, former AS

44.19.040

was renumbered as AS

44.19.022

.

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 107.

81A C.J.S., States, § 174.

Sec. 44.19.042.
Succession to office.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of governor and the regularly elected lieutenant governor succeeds to the office of governor as provided by art. III, § 11, of the constitution, or if the office of lieutenant governor otherwise becomes vacant, the person designated as next successor to the office of lieutenant governor as provided in
AS

44.19.040

succeeds to the office of lieutenant governor for the remainder of the term vacated, or until a special election is held.
When the person appointed under
AS

44.19.040

succeeds to the office of lieutenant governor, the governor shall appoint a person to succeed to the office of lieutenant governor in case of a subsequent vacancy.

History.

(§ 3 ch 174 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.19.130. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.19.044.
Special election in case of second vacancy in office of governor.

If the regularly elected lieutenant governor succeeds to the office of governor as provided in the constitution and thereafter, during the same regular gubernatorial term, the office of governor again becomes vacant, the appointed lieutenant governor succeeds to the office of acting governor until a special election to elect a governor and lieutenant governor is held.

History.

(§ 4 ch 174 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.140

. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For special election, see AS

15.40.230

—

15.40.310

.

Sec. 44.19.045.
[Renumbered as AS 44.19.024.]

Sec. 44.19.046.
Simultaneous vacancies.

If vacancies in the office of governor and the office of lieutenant governor occur simultaneously, the person appointed under AS

44.19.040

succeeds directly to the office of acting governor until successors to the respective offices are elected in a special election.

History.

(§ 5 ch 174 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.150

. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For special election, see AS

15.40.230

—

15.40.310

.

Secs. 44.19.048 — 44.19.052.
Disaster and emergency relief funds. [Repealed, § 18 ch 178 SLA 1990. For current law, see AS 26.23.300 — 26.23.400.]

Secs. 44.19.054 — 44.19.062.
State Geographic Board. [Repealed, E.O. No. 83, §
20 (1993).]

Secs. 44.19.064 — 44.19.068.
International Development Commission. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 44.19.070.
Administration. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986. Former AS 44.19.070 was renumbered as AS 44.19.030 in 1980.]

Sec. 44.19.072.
Duties of commission. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 44.19.074.
Alaska State Office. [Repealed, E.O. No. 57, § 4 (1984).]

Sec. 44.19.075.
Alaska foreign offices established. [Repealed, E.O. No. 79, § 5 (1991).]

Secs. 44.19.076 — 44.19.078.
Personnel; information. [Repealed, E.O. No. 57, § 4 (1984).]

Sec. 44.19.080.
Annual report. [Repealed, E.O. No. 57, § 4 (1984). Former AS 44.19.080 was renumbered as AS 44.99.002 in 1980.]

Sec. 44.19.082.
Expenses. [Repealed, E.O. No. 57, § 4 (1984).]

Secs. 44.19.084 — 44.19.089.
Commission for Northern Operations of Rail Transportation and Highways. [Repealed, § 96 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 44.19.090.
Powers and duties. [Repealed, § 96 ch 59 SLA 1982. Former AS 44.19.090 was renumbered as AS 44.99.003 in 1980.]

Sec. 44.19.100.
Report. [Repealed, § 96 ch 59 SLA 1982. Former AS 44.19.100 was renumbered as AS 44.99.004 in 1980.]

Secs. 44.19.101 — 44.19.105.
Rural Affairs Commission. [Repealed, § 13 ch 43 SLA 1994.]

Secs. 44.19.110 — 44.19.114.
Establishment of the commission; membership of the commission; compensation and per diem. [Repealed, § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 44.19.115.
[Renumbered as AS 44.99.006.]

Secs. 44.19.116 — 44.19.122.
Grants and other aid; commission as state planning agency; duties of state planning agency. [Repealed, § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001.]

Secs. 44.19.123 — 44.19.130.
Involvement of Young People in Government. [Repealed, § 13 ch 43 SLA 1994.]

Secs. 44.19.131 — 44.19.135.
Commission on the Conference of the Law of the Sea. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 44.19.140.
Powers. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986. Former AS 44.19.140 was renumbered as AS 44.19.044 in 1980.]